South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4162.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 8-13-100(1)(b) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (b) "Anything of value" or "thing of value" does not mean: (i) printed informational or promotional material, not to exceed ten dollars in monetary value; (ii) items of nominal value, not to exceed ten dollars, containing or displaying promotional material; (iii) a personalized plaque or trophy with a value that does not exceed one hundred fifty dollars; (iv) educational material of a nominal value directly related to the public official's, public member's, or public employee's official responsibilities; (v) an honorary degree bestowed upon a public official, public member, or public employee by a public or private university or college; or (vi) promotional or marketing items offered to the general public on the same terms and conditions without regard to status as a public official or public employee;  or. (vii) a campaign contribution properly received and reported under the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----